Louisiana, session 2026, SB57.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:661(C)(1) as enacted by Section 3 of Act No. 463 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§661. Food containing artificial colors, additives, or banned chemicals; ingredient
information
* * *
C.(1) The provisions of this Section shall only apply to if the United States
Food and Drug Administration requires the ingredient to be named on a food
label and the ingredient is used in food or beverages intended for human
consumption.
* * *
Section 2. Section 5(D) of Act No. 463 of the 2025 Regular Session of the
Legislature of Louisiana is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Section 5.
* * *
(D) The heading of Part I-B and R.S. 40:661 as enacted by Section 3 of
this Act shall become effective on December 31, 2028. R.S. 40:662 as enacted by
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 57 ENROLLED
Section 3 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2028.
Section 3. R.S. 40:661(A)(1) as enacted by Section 3 of Act No. 463 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana and R.S. 17:197.2(B)(13) as enacted by
Section 1 of Act No. 463 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana are
hereby repealed.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.